New.aff
#Cross product of subject markers and object markers in present and very near past tense
# Generated via script to handle chaining 
PFX N Y 553
PFX N 0 ngu .
PFX N 0 ngi .
PFX N 0 nzi .
PFX N 0 nki .
PFX N 0 nga .
PFX N 0 nka .
PFX N 0 nku .
PFX N 0 ntu .
PFX N 0 mba .
PFX N 0 mbi .
PFX N 0 mbu .
PFX N 0 on [^lmn]
PFX N l ond l.[^mn]
PFX N l onn l.[mn]
PFX N w omp [w]
PFX N 0 omu .
PFX N 0 oba .
PFX N 0 ogu .
PFX N 0 ogi .
PFX N 0 ozi .
PFX N 0 oki .
PFX N 0 obi .
PFX N 0 oli .
PFX N 0 oga .
PFX N 0 oka .
PFX N 0 obu .
PFX N 0 olu .
PFX N 0 oku .
PFX N 0 otu .
PFX N 0 ndi .
PFX N 0 ndu .
PFX N 0 an [^lmn]
PFX N l and l.[^mn]
PFX N l ann l.[mn]
PFX N w amp [w]
PFX N 0 amu .
PFX N 0 aba .
PFX N 0 agu .
PFX N 0 agi .
PFX N 0 azi .
PFX N 0 aki .
PFX N 0 abi .
PFX N 0 ali .
PFX N 0 aga .
PFX N 0 aka .
PFX N 0 abu .
PFX N 0 alu .
PFX N 0 aku .
PFX N 0 atu .
PFX N 0 tun [^lmn]
PFX N l tund l.[^mn]
PFX N l tunn l.[mn]
PFX N w tump [w]
PFX N 0 tumu .
PFX N 0 tuba .
PFX N 0 tugu .
PFX N 0 tugi .
PFX N 0 tuzi .
PFX N 0 tuki .
PFX N 0 tubi .
PFX N 0 tuli .
PFX N 0 tuga .
PFX N 0 tuka .
PFX N 0 tubu .
PFX N 0 tulu .
PFX N 0 tuku .
PFX N 0 tutu .
PFX N 0 mun [^lmn]
PFX N l mund l.[^mn]
PFX N l munn l.[mn]
PFX N w mump [w]
PFX N 0 mumu .
PFX N 0 muba .
PFX N 0 mugu .
PFX N 0 mugi .
PFX N 0 muzi .
PFX N 0 muki .
PFX N 0 mubi .
PFX N 0 muli .
PFX N 0 muga .
PFX N 0 muka .
PFX N 0 mubu .
PFX N 0 mulu .
PFX N 0 muku .
PFX N 0 mutu .
PFX N 0 ban [^lmn]
PFX N l band l.[^mn]
PFX N l bann l.[mn]
PFX N w bamp [w]
PFX N 0 bamu .
PFX N 0 baba .
PFX N 0 bagu .
PFX N 0 bagi .
PFX N 0 bazi .
PFX N 0 baki .
PFX N 0 babi .
PFX N 0 bali .
PFX N 0 baga .
PFX N 0 baka .
PFX N 0 babu .
PFX N 0 balu .
PFX N 0 baku .
PFX N 0 batu .
PFX N 0 aban [^lmn]
PFX N l aband l.[^mn]
PFX N l abann l.[mn]
PFX N w abamp [w]
PFX N 0 abamu .
PFX N 0 ababa .
PFX N 0 abagu .
PFX N 0 abagi .
PFX N 0 abazi .
PFX N 0 abaki .
PFX N 0 ababi .
PFX N 0 abali .
PFX N 0 abaga .
PFX N 0 abaka .
PFX N 0 ababu .
PFX N 0 abalu .
PFX N 0 abaku .
PFX N 0 abatu .
PFX N 0 gun [^lmn]
PFX N l gund l.[^mn]
PFX N l gunn l.[mn]
PFX N w gump [w]
PFX N 0 gumu .
PFX N 0 guba .
PFX N 0 gugu .
PFX N 0 gugi .
PFX N 0 guzi .
PFX N 0 guki .
PFX N 0 gubi .
PFX N 0 guli .
PFX N 0 guga .
PFX N 0 guka .
PFX N 0 gubu .
PFX N 0 gulu .
PFX N 0 guku .
PFX N 0 gutu .
PFX N 0 ogun [^lmn]
PFX N l ogund l.[^mn]
PFX N l ogunn l.[mn]
PFX N w ogump [w]
PFX N 0 ogumu .
PFX N 0 oguba .
PFX N 0 ogugu .
PFX N 0 ogugi .
PFX N 0 oguzi .
PFX N 0 oguki .
PFX N 0 ogubi .
PFX N 0 oguli .
PFX N 0 oguga .
PFX N 0 oguka .
PFX N 0 ogubu .
PFX N 0 ogulu .
PFX N 0 oguku .
PFX N 0 ogutu .
PFX N 0 gin [^lmn]
PFX N l gind l.[^mn]
PFX N l ginn l.[mn]
PFX N w gimp [w]
PFX N 0 gimu .
PFX N 0 giba .
PFX N 0 gigu .
PFX N 0 gigi .
PFX N 0 gizi .
PFX N 0 giki .
PFX N 0 gibi .
PFX N 0 gili .
PFX N 0 giga .
PFX N 0 gika .
PFX N 0 gibu .
PFX N 0 gilu .
PFX N 0 giku .
PFX N 0 gitu .
PFX N 0 egin [^lmn]
PFX N l egind l.[^mn]
PFX N l eginn l.[mn]
PFX N w egimp [w]
PFX N 0 egimu .
PFX N 0 egiba .
PFX N 0 egigu .
PFX N 0 egigi .
PFX N 0 egizi .
PFX N 0 egiki .
PFX N 0 egibi .
PFX N 0 egili .
PFX N 0 egiga .
PFX N 0 egika .
PFX N 0 egibu .
PFX N 0 egilu .
PFX N 0 egiku .
PFX N 0 egitu .
PFX N 0 en [^lmn]
PFX N l end l.[^mn]
PFX N l enn l.[mn]
PFX N w emp [w]
PFX N 0 emu .
PFX N 0 eba .
PFX N 0 egu .
PFX N 0 egi .
PFX N 0 ezi .
PFX N 0 eki .
PFX N 0 ebi .
PFX N 0 eli .
PFX N 0 ega .
PFX N 0 eka .
PFX N 0 ebu .
PFX N 0 elu .
PFX N 0 eku .
PFX N 0 etu .
PFX N 0 zin [^lmn]
PFX N l zind l.[^mn]
PFX N l zinn l.[mn]
PFX N w zimp [w]
PFX N 0 zimu .
PFX N 0 ziba .
PFX N 0 zigu .
PFX N 0 zigi .
PFX N 0 zizi .
PFX N 0 ziki .
PFX N 0 zibi .
PFX N 0 zili .
PFX N 0 ziga .
PFX N 0 zika .
PFX N 0 zibu .
PFX N 0 zilu .
PFX N 0 ziku .
PFX N 0 zitu .
PFX N 0 ezin [^lmn]
PFX N l ezind l.[^mn]
PFX N l ezinn l.[mn]
PFX N w ezimp [w]
PFX N 0 ezimu .
PFX N 0 eziba .
PFX N 0 ezigu .
PFX N 0 ezigi .
PFX N 0 ezizi .
PFX N 0 eziki .
PFX N 0 ezibi .
PFX N 0 ezili .
PFX N 0 eziga .
PFX N 0 ezika .
PFX N 0 ezibu .
PFX N 0 ezilu .
PFX N 0 eziku .
PFX N 0 ezitu .
PFX N 0 kin [^lmn]
PFX N l kind l.[^mn]
PFX N l kinn l.[mn]
PFX N w kimp [w]
PFX N 0 kimu .
PFX N 0 kiba .
PFX N 0 kigu .
PFX N 0 kigi .
PFX N 0 kizi .
PFX N 0 kiki .
PFX N 0 kibi .
PFX N 0 kili .
PFX N 0 kiga .
PFX N 0 kika .
PFX N 0 kibu .
PFX N 0 kilu .
PFX N 0 kiku .
PFX N 0 kitu .
PFX N 0 ekin [^lmn]
PFX N l ekind l.[^mn]
PFX N l ekinn l.[mn]
PFX N w ekimp [w]
PFX N 0 ekimu .
PFX N 0 ekiba .
PFX N 0 ekigu .
PFX N 0 ekigi .
PFX N 0 ekizi .
PFX N 0 ekiki .
PFX N 0 ekibi .
PFX N 0 ekili .
PFX N 0 ekiga .
PFX N 0 ekika .
PFX N 0 ekibu .
PFX N 0 ekilu .
PFX N 0 ekiku .
PFX N 0 ekitu .
PFX N 0 bin [^lmn]
PFX N l bind l.[^mn]
PFX N l binn l.[mn]
PFX N w bimp [w]
PFX N 0 bimu .
PFX N 0 biba .
PFX N 0 bigu .
PFX N 0 bigi .
PFX N 0 bizi .
PFX N 0 biki .
PFX N 0 bibi .
PFX N 0 bili .
PFX N 0 biga .
PFX N 0 bika .
PFX N 0 bibu .
PFX N 0 bilu .
PFX N 0 biku .
PFX N 0 bitu .
PFX N 0 ebin [^lmn]
PFX N l ebind l.[^mn]
PFX N l ebinn l.[mn]
PFX N w ebimp [w]
PFX N 0 ebimu .
PFX N 0 ebiba .
PFX N 0 ebigu .
PFX N 0 ebigi .
PFX N 0 ebizi .
PFX N 0 ebiki .
PFX N 0 ebibi .
PFX N 0 ebili .
PFX N 0 ebiga .
PFX N 0 ebika .
PFX N 0 ebibu .
PFX N 0 ebilu .
PFX N 0 ebiku .
PFX N 0 ebitu .
PFX N 0 lin [^lmn]
PFX N l lind l.[^mn]
PFX N l linn l.[mn]
PFX N w limp [w]
PFX N 0 limu .
PFX N 0 liba .
PFX N 0 ligu .
PFX N 0 ligi .
PFX N 0 lizi .
PFX N 0 liki .
PFX N 0 libi .
PFX N 0 lili .
PFX N 0 liga .
PFX N 0 lika .
PFX N 0 libu .
PFX N 0 lilu .
PFX N 0 liku .
PFX N 0 litu .
PFX N 0 elin [^lmn]
PFX N l elind l.[^mn]
PFX N l elinn l.[mn]
PFX N w elimp [w]
PFX N 0 elimu .
PFX N 0 eliba .
PFX N 0 eligu .
PFX N 0 eligi .
PFX N 0 elizi .
PFX N 0 eliki .
PFX N 0 elibi .
PFX N 0 elili .
PFX N 0 eliga .
PFX N 0 elika .
PFX N 0 elibu .
PFX N 0 elilu .
PFX N 0 eliku .
PFX N 0 elitu .
PFX N 0 gan [^lmn]
PFX N l gand l.[^mn]
PFX N l gann l.[mn]
PFX N w gamp [w]
PFX N 0 gamu .
PFX N 0 gaba .
PFX N 0 gagu .
PFX N 0 gagi .
PFX N 0 gazi .
PFX N 0 gaki .
PFX N 0 gabi .
PFX N 0 gali .
PFX N 0 gaga .
PFX N 0 gaka .
PFX N 0 gabu .
PFX N 0 galu .
PFX N 0 gaku .
PFX N 0 gatu .
PFX N 0 agan [^lmn]
PFX N l agand l.[^mn]
PFX N l agann l.[mn]
PFX N w agamp [w]
PFX N 0 agamu .
PFX N 0 agaba .
PFX N 0 agagu .
PFX N 0 agagi .
PFX N 0 agazi .
PFX N 0 agaki .
PFX N 0 agabi .
PFX N 0 agali .
PFX N 0 agaga .
PFX N 0 agaka .
PFX N 0 agabu .
PFX N 0 agalu .
PFX N 0 agaku .
PFX N 0 agatu .
PFX N 0 kan [^lmn]
PFX N l kand l.[^mn]
PFX N l kann l.[mn]
PFX N w kamp [w]
PFX N 0 kamu .
PFX N 0 kaba .
PFX N 0 kagu .
PFX N 0 kagi .
PFX N 0 kazi .
PFX N 0 kaki .
PFX N 0 kabi .
PFX N 0 kali .
PFX N 0 kaga .
PFX N 0 kaka .
PFX N 0 kabu .
PFX N 0 kalu .
PFX N 0 kaku .
PFX N 0 katu .
PFX N 0 akan [^lmn]
PFX N l akand l.[^mn]
PFX N l akann l.[mn]
PFX N w akamp [w]
PFX N 0 akamu .
PFX N 0 akaba .
PFX N 0 akagu .
PFX N 0 akagi .
PFX N 0 akazi .
PFX N 0 akaki .
PFX N 0 akabi .
PFX N 0 akali .
PFX N 0 akaga .
PFX N 0 akaka .
PFX N 0 akabu .
PFX N 0 akalu .
PFX N 0 akaku .
PFX N 0 akatu .
PFX N 0 bun [^lmn]
PFX N l bund l.[^mn]
PFX N l bunn l.[mn]
PFX N w bump [w]
PFX N 0 bumu .
PFX N 0 buba .
PFX N 0 bugu .
PFX N 0 bugi .
PFX N 0 buzi .
PFX N 0 buki .
PFX N 0 bubi .
PFX N 0 buli .
PFX N 0 buga .
PFX N 0 buka .
PFX N 0 bubu .
PFX N 0 bulu .
PFX N 0 buku .
PFX N 0 butu .
PFX N 0 obun [^lmn]
PFX N l obund l.[^mn]
PFX N l obunn l.[mn]
PFX N w obump [w]
PFX N 0 obumu .
PFX N 0 obuba .
PFX N 0 obugu .
PFX N 0 obugi .
PFX N 0 obuzi .
PFX N 0 obuki .
PFX N 0 obubi .
PFX N 0 obuli .
PFX N 0 obuga .
PFX N 0 obuka .
PFX N 0 obubu .
PFX N 0 obulu .
PFX N 0 obuku .
PFX N 0 obutu .
PFX N 0 lun [^lmn]
PFX N l lund l.[^mn]
PFX N l lunn l.[mn]
PFX N w lump [w]
PFX N 0 lumu .
PFX N 0 luba .
PFX N 0 lugu .
PFX N 0 lugi .
PFX N 0 luzi .
PFX N 0 luki .
PFX N 0 lubi .
PFX N 0 luli .
PFX N 0 luga .
PFX N 0 luka .
PFX N 0 lubu .
PFX N 0 lulu .
PFX N 0 luku .
PFX N 0 lutu .
PFX N 0 olun [^lmn]
PFX N l olund l.[^mn]
PFX N l olunn l.[mn]
PFX N w olump [w]
